Alabama, session 2026rs, HB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 22-18-60, 22-18-61, 22-18-62, and
15 22-18-64, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
16 follows:
17 "§22-18-60
18 For the purposes of this article, the following terms
19 shall have the following meanings:
20 (1) ACCS. The Alabama Community College System.
21 (2) AMBULANCE SERVICE. An ambulance service located in
22 this state which is a member of the Alabama Association of
23 Ambulance Services.
24 (3) ASSOCIATIONS. The Alabama Association of Rescue
25 Squads, the Alabama Association of Volunteer Fire Departments,
26 or the Alabama Association of Ambulance Services.
27 (4) DESIGNATED EMS REGIONAL AGENCY. A regional agency
28 of the Office of Emergency Medical Services of the Alabama
Page 1

of the Office of Emergency Medical Services of the Alabama
HB116 Enrolled
29 Department of Public Health which is designated by the
30 department to offer educational courses to students.
31 (5) ELIGIBLE EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION. A member school
32 of the ACCS, the fire college, the University of South
33 Alabama, or a designated regional EMS agency.
34 (4)(6) EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICE PERSONNEL (EMSP). All
35 recognized levels of personnel licensed by the Alabama
36 Department of Public Health, who have met all primary or
37 renewal educational requirements, or both, set by the Alabama
38 Department of Public Health, and who are allowed to provide
39 medical care within the level of their scope of practice
40 granted by the Office of Emergency Medical Services within the
41 Alabama Department of Public Health.
42 (5)(7) FIRE COLLEGE. The Alabama Fire College.
43 (6)(8) STUDENT. A student enrolled in an emergency
44 medical services certification program at a member institution
45 of the ACCS, the fire college, or the University of South
46 Alabamaan eligible educational institution.
47 (7)(9) TUITION COSTS. Includes the actual cost of
48 tuition and fees required to complete an approved
49 courseprogram of instruction for EMSP certification, as
50 determined by each eligible educational institution.
51 (8)(11) VOLUNTEER RESCUE SQUAD. A volunteer rescue
52 squad located in this state andthat is a member of the Alabama
53 Association of Rescue Squads.
54 (9)(10) VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT. A volunteer fire
55 department located in this state."
56 "§22-18-61
Page 2

"§22-18-61
HB116 Enrolled
57 (a) The ACCS, the fire college, and the University of
58 South AlabamaEligible educational institutions, in
59 consultation with the associations, shall jointly develop and
60 administer a student tuition reimbursement program for
61 students who contract to provide two years of emergency
62 medical services for volunteer rescue squads, volunteer fire
63 departments, or ambulance services after becoming a licensed
64 EMSP.
65 (b)(1) Tuition reimbursement under this article shall
66 cover tuition costs paid by the student or the volunteer
67 rescue squad, volunteer fire department, ambulance service, or
68 association on behalf of the student of which the student is a
69 member. Tuition paid by the volunteer rescue squad, volunteer
70 fire department, ambulance service, or association shall be
71 reimbursed directly to the volunteer rescue squad, volunteer
72 fire department, ambulance service, or association.
73 (2) Tuition reimbursement under this article shall not
74 include any tuition costs covered by grants or other monetary
75 awards provided to a student including, but not limited to,
76 federal education grants and scholarships, as determined by
77 the ACCS.
78 (3) Tuition costs shall not be reimbursed until the
79 student provides ACCS and the associations with documentation
80 that he or she has successfully completed the approved
81 courseprogram of instruction, proof of passing the
82 certification exam, production of a valid EMSP license from
83 the Alabama Department of Public Health, and a contractual
84 agreement to comply with the service requirements.
Page 3

agreement to comply with the service requirements.
HB116 Enrolled
85 (c) In the event that a tuition reimbursement recipient
86 fails to meet the service requirements for any reason other
87 than extreme hardship as defined within the joint agreement
88 required in Section 22-18-64(b), the individual shall be
89 deemed to have breached the underlying contract and shall be
90 liable in the form of monetary damages to the state for the
91 immediate repayment of the total tuition costs reimbursed,
92 plus interest at the rate of eight percent. The associations
93 shall notify ACCS of recipients who fail to meet the service
94 requirements.
95 (d) Beginning with the 2023-2024 fiscal year, the
96 amount of tuition reimbursement available to students shall be
97 divided among volunteer fire departments, rescue squads, and
98 ambulance services based on available appropriations. in
99 compliance with the following standards:
100 (1) The ACCS shall create operational procedures to
101 ensure that funds and volunteer service commitments are split
102 equitably among volunteer fire departments, rescue squads, and
103 ambulance services. Notwithstanding the foregoing, priority
104 shall be given to volunteer fire departments, rescue squads,
105 and nonprofit ambulance services.
106 (2) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall adopt
107 a rule imposing a monetary cap on the amount of tuition costs
108 that may be reimbursed for students who complete the program
109 of instruction through a designated regional EMS agency, which
110 shall not exceed any cap in effect on the amount of reimbursed
111 tuition costs for the Alabama Fire College."
112 "§22-18-62
Page 4

"§22-18-62
HB116 Enrolled
113 Beginning October 1, 2018, the member(a) Member
114 institutions of the ACCS, the Fire Collegefire college, and
115 the University of South Alabama, and designated EMS regional
116 agencies may enter into contracts with new students seeking to
117 obtain certification as an EMSP.
118 (b) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall adopt
119 rules setting credentialing and accreditation standards for
120 private companies and instructors that teach courses on behalf
121 of the designated EMS regional agencies which are equal to the
122 standards of the other eligible education institutions."
123 "§22-18-64
124 (a) The ACCS shall annually report on the condition and
125 accomplishments of the tuition reimbursement program to the
126 Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, President
127 Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Chair of the House Ways and
128 Means Education Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and
129 Taxation Education Committee, and the Deputy Director of the
130 Legislative Services Agency, Fiscal Division. The report shall
131 include the number of students participating in the program
132 and the amount of tuition reimbursed for the reporting year.
133 The memberEligible educational institutions of the ACCS, the
134 fire college, and the University of South Alabama shall
135 provide this information to ACCS for inclusion in the annual
136 report. The report shall be submitted by the fifth legislative
137 day of each regular session of the Legislature.
138 (b) The ACCS, the fire college, and the University of
139 South Alabama shall enter into a joint agreement with the
140 other eligible educational institutions to implement and
Page 5

other eligible educational institutions to implement and
HB116 Enrolled
141 administer the tuition reimbursement program, which shall
142 include provisions for ensuring that operational expenses for
143 the program in a fiscal year do not exceed 10 percent of the
144 funding for the program in that fiscal year. The joint
145 agreement shall provide for limiting the acceptance of
146 applications for the program or limiting tuition
147 reimbursements when necessary, or both.
148 (c) Any monies received for the operations of the
149 tuition reimbursement program, including repayments, interest,
150 and penalties paid because of failure to honor service
151 requirements, shall be used to fund tuition reimbursements."
152 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
153 1, 2026.
Page 6

1, 2026.
HB116 Enrolled
154
155
156
157
158
159
160
161
162
163 ________________________________________________
164 Speaker of the House of Representatives
165
166
167
168 ________________________________________________
169 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
170
171
172 House of Representatives
173
174 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
175 was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.
176
177 John Treadwell
178 Clerk
179
180
181
182
183
184 Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed
185
186
187
Page 7